Hawaii statutes.
§706-650.5 Human trafficking victim
services fund. (1) In addition to any disposition authorized by chapter
706, any individual who is:

(a) Convicted of an offense under part VIII of
chapter 707; or

(b) Convicted of an offense under part I of chapter
712;

shall be ordered to pay a fee under subsection (2).

(2) Fees for individuals subject to subsection
(1) shall not exceed the following:

(a) $5,000 when the offense is a class A felony;

(b) $2,500 when the offense is a class B felony;

(c) $1,000 when the offense is a class C felony;

(d) $500 when the offense is a misdemeanor; or

(e) $250 when the offense is a petty misdemeanor.

(3) There is established within the state
treasury a special fund to be known as the human trafficking victim services
fund to be administered by the department of labor and industrial relations.
The disbursement of money from the human trafficking victim services fund shall
be used to supplement programs, grants, or purchase of service contracts that
support or provide comprehensive services to victims of labor trafficking
crimes under part VIII of chapter 707, or victims of trafficking related to
crimes under part I of chapter 712. Moneys in the special fund shall be used
for new or existing programs, grants, or purchase of service contracts and
shall not supplant any other moneys previously allocated to these programs,
grants, or purchase of service contracts.

(4) All fees paid and interest accrued on
funds collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the human
trafficking victim services fund.

(5) When a defendant is ordered to make
payments in addition to the human trafficking victim services fee authorized
under subsection (2), payments by the defendant shall be made pursuant to
section 706-651.

(6) The department of labor and industrial
relations shall submit to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to
the convening of each regular session a written annual report that provides the
following:

(a) An accounting of the receipts of and expenditures
from the human trafficking victim services fund; and

(b) Any recommendations to improve support of and
services to victims of labor trafficking crimes under part VIII of chapter 707,
or victims of trafficking related to crimes under part I of chapter 712. [L
2014, c 119, §1; am L 2016, c 231, §28]

COMMENTARY ON §706-650.5

Act 119, Session Laws 2014, added this section to impose a
human trafficking victim services fee upon individuals who are convicted of
certain trafficking offenses and to establish the human trafficking victim
services fund, to provide support and services to human trafficking victims.
The legislature found that existing law did not provide a source of revenue to
support and provide services to human trafficking victims who often require
access to basic and life-sustaining services, including toiletries and food,
and may require long-term access to stable and supportive environments, such as
licensed residential treatment facilities. Senate Standing Committee Report
No. 3043, Conference Committee Report No. 97-14.

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended subsection (5) to
implement recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened
pursuant to House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next